Mississippi, session 2026, HB1580.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Companies that offer Medicare Advantage Plans and Medicare Part D Plans to residents of Mississippi shall pay the agents and brokers who sell the plans the fair market value commission rate that is set by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. SECTION 2. Companies that offer Medicare supplement policies to residents of Mississippi shall use the Medicare Advantage flat fee commission model for paying the agents and brokers who sell the policies. SECTION 3. Companies that offer Medicare supplement policies to residents of Mississippi shall have an open enrollment period every five (5) years for persons from sixty-five (65) years of age to eighty (80) years of age.  During a sixty-day window starting with their birth month, a person must be given a one-time special election to purchase a Medicare supplement policy without answering medical questions, and the agents and brokers who sell the policies shall be paid the full commission. SECTION 4. Companies that offer Medicare Advantage Plans, Medicare Part D Plans and Medicare supplement policies to residents of Mississippi must require all providers in the company's network to submit "intent to exit" paperwork to the network not later than August 1 of each year in order to leave the network, or the provider will be locked in the network for the upcoming calendar year. SECTION 5. Companies that offer Medicare Advantage Plans, Medicare Part D Plans and Medicare supplement policies to residents of Mississippi shall keep the information about 1099 insurance agents (independent contractors) who sell their products separate from the information about W-2 insurance agents (work for an employer) who sell their products. SECTION 6. The Commissioner of Insurance shall enforce the provisions of Sections 1 through 5 of this act, and is authorized to use any of the enforcement mechanisms provided to the commissioner by law. SECTION 7.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.